Indiana, session 2026, SB144.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 7.1-1-3-47.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.163-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 47.5. (a) "Tobacco product", except as provided
in subsection (b), has the meaning set forth in IC 7.1-6-1-3.
(b) "Tobacco product", for purposes of IC 7.1-3-18.5, means a
product that:
(1) contains tobacco or nicotine, including e-liquid (as defined by
IC 7.1-7-2-10) and e-liquid products (as defined by
IC 7.1-7-2-10.5);
(2) is intended for human consumption; and
(3) is not approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration
for tobacco cessation.
SECTION 2. IC 7.1-7-6-5, AS AMENDED BY ESB 185-2026,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A person who knowingly or intentionally makes
a delivery sale of an e-liquid, an e-liquid product, or a vapor device to
an individual who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age commits a
Class C Class B infraction.
SECTION 3. IC 35-31.5-2-107.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.49-2020,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 107.5. "E-liquid" for purposes of IC 35-46-1, has
SEA 144 — CC 1

2
the meaning set forth in IC 35-46-1-1.4.
SECTION 4. IC 35-31.5-2-345.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 345.4. "Vapor device" means a
powered vaporizer that converts e-liquid to a vapor intended for
inhalation.
SECTION 5. IC 35-46-1-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.163-2025,
SECTION 62, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A person may not be charged with a
violation under this section and a violation under IC 7.1-7-6-5.
(b) A person who knowingly:
(1) sells or distributes a tobacco product or a vapor device to a
person less than twenty-one (21) years of age; or
(2) purchases a tobacco product or a vapor device for delivery to
another person who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age;
commits a Class C Class B infraction. For a sale to take place under
this section, the buyer must pay the seller for the tobacco product or
vapor device.
(c) It is not a defense that the person to whom the tobacco product
or vapor device was sold or distributed did not smoke, chew, inhale,
or otherwise consume the tobacco product or vapor device.
(d) The following defenses are available to a person accused of
selling or distributing a tobacco product or a vapor device to a person
who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age:
(1) The buyer or recipient produced a driver's license bearing the
purchaser's or recipient's photograph, showing that the purchaser
or recipient was of legal age to make the purchase.
(2) The buyer or recipient produced a photographic identification
card issued under IC 9-24-16-1, or a similar card issued under the
laws of another state or the federal government, showing that the
purchaser or recipient was of legal age to make the purchase.
(3) The appearance of the purchaser or recipient was such that an
ordinary prudent person would believe that the purchaser or
recipient was not less than thirty (30) years of age.
(e) It is a defense that the accused person sold or delivered the
tobacco product or vapor device to a person who acted in the ordinary
course of employment or a business concerning tobacco products or
vapor devices including the following activities:
(1) Agriculture.
(2) Processing.
(3) Transporting.
(4) Wholesaling.
SEA 144 — CC 1

3
(5) Retailing.
(f) As used in this section, "distribute" means to give a tobacco
product or a vapor device to another person as a means of promoting,
advertising, or marketing the tobacco product or vapor device to the
general public.
(g) Unless the person buys or receives a tobacco product or a vapor
device under the direction of a law enforcement officer as part of an
enforcement action, a person who sells or distributes a tobacco product
or a vapor device is not liable for a violation of this section unless the
person less than twenty-one (21) years of age who bought or received
the tobacco product or vapor device is issued a citation or summons
under section 10.5 of this chapter.
(h) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-5(c), civil penalties collected under
this section must be deposited in the Richard D. Doyle tobacco
education and enforcement fund (IC 7.1-6-2-6).
SECTION 6. IC 35-46-1-10.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.163-2025,
SECTION 64, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a) A person less than twenty-one (21) years
of age who:
(1) purchases a tobacco product or vapor device;
(2) accepts a tobacco product or vapor device for personal use;
or
(3) possesses a tobacco product or vapor device on the person's
person;
commits a Class C infraction.
(b) It is a defense under subsection (a) that the accused person acted
in the ordinary course of employment in a business concerning a
tobacco product or vapor device for the following activities:
(1) Agriculture.
(2) Processing.
(3) Transporting.
(4) Wholesaling.
(5) Retailing.
(c) A person less than twenty-one (21) years of age who has in the
person's possession false or fraudulent evidence of majority or identity
with the intent to purchase a tobacco product or vapor device commits
a Class C infraction.
SECTION 7. IC 35-46-1-11.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.1. (a) A person may not
advertise an e-liquid or a vapor product (as defined in
IC 7.1-7-2-23), by any medium, within one thousand (1,000) feet of
SEA 144 — CC 1

4
school property (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-285).
(b) A person who violates this section commits a Class C
infraction. However, the violation is a Class C misdemeanor if the
person has a prior unrelated judgment for violating this section.
SEA 144 — CC 1

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 144 — CC 1